Utah statutes.
70-3a-304.   Certification of registration.
(1)  If an applicant fully complies with this chapter, the division shall:
(a)  certify the registration; and
(b)  provide to the applicant documentation that the registration is
certified.
(2)  The documentation described in Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  be affixed to the application of the applicant; or
(b)  include the information that is required to be in an application under
Subsections 70-3a-302(1)(c)(i) through (iii).
(3)  The following are admissible in evidence as competent and sufficient
proof of the registration of the particular mark in any action or judicial
proceeding in any court of this state:
(a)  the documentation described in Subsection (1)(b) that is provided by the
division; or
(b)  a copy of the documentation described in Subsection (1)(b) if the copy is
certified by the division.
(4)  Documentation of the certification of an electronically registered mark
shall be provided through the database created under Section 70-3a-501.
